Illinois, session 104th, HB2840.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Workers' Compensation Act is amended by 5changing Section 8.2 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 305/8.2)7    Sec. 8.2. Fee schedule. 8    (a) Except as provided for in subsection (c), for 9procedures, treatments, or services covered under this Act and 10rendered or to be rendered on and after February 1, 2006, the 11maximum allowable payment shall be 90% of the 80th percentile 12of charges and fees as determined by the Commission utilizing 13information provided by employers' and insurers' national 14databases, with a minimum of 12,000,000 Illinois line item 15charges and fees comprised of health care provider and 16hospital charges and fees as of August 1, 2004 but not earlier 17than August 1, 2002. These charges and fees are provider 18billed amounts and shall not include discounted charges. The 1980th percentile is the point on an ordered data set from low to 20high such that 80% of the cases are below or equal to that 21point and at most 20% are above or equal to that point. The 22Commission shall adjust these historical charges and fees as 23of August 1, 2004 by the Consumer Price Index-U for the period   HB2840- 2 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1August 1, 2004 through September 30, 2005. The Commission 2shall establish fee schedules for procedures, treatments, or 3services for hospital inpatient, hospital outpatient, 4emergency room and trauma, ambulatory surgical treatment 5centers, and professional services. These charges and fees 6shall be designated by geozip or any smaller geographic unit. 7The data shall in no way identify or tend to identify any 8patient, employer, or health care provider. As used in this 9Section, "geozip" means a three-digit zip code based on data 10similarities, geographical similarities, and frequencies. A 11geozip does not cross state boundaries. As used in this 12Section, "three-digit zip code" means a geographic area in 13which all zip codes have the same first 3 digits. If a geozip 14does not have the necessary number of charges and fees to 15calculate a valid percentile for a specific procedure, 16treatment, or service, the Commission may combine data from 17the geozip with up to 4 other geozips that are demographically 18and economically similar and exhibit similarities in data and 19frequencies until the Commission reaches 9 charges or fees for 20that specific procedure, treatment, or service. In cases where 21the compiled data contains less than 9 charges or fees for a 22procedure, treatment, or service, reimbursement shall occur at 2376% of charges and fees as determined by the Commission in a 24manner consistent with the provisions of this paragraph. 25Providers of out-of-state procedures, treatments, services, 26products, or supplies shall be reimbursed at the lesser of   HB2840- 3 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1that state's fee schedule amount or the fee schedule amount 2for the region in which the employee resides. If no fee 3schedule exists in that state, the provider shall be 4reimbursed at the lesser of the actual charge or the fee 5schedule amount for the region in which the employee resides. 6Not later than September 30 in 2006 and each year thereafter, 7the Commission shall automatically increase or decrease the 8maximum allowable payment for a procedure, treatment, or 9service established and in effect on January 1 of that year by 10the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index-U for the 12 11month period ending August 31 of that year. The increase or 12decrease shall become effective on January 1 of the following 13year. As used in this Section, "Consumer Price Index-U" means 14the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the 15U.S. Department of Labor, that measures the average change in 16prices of all goods and services purchased by all urban 17consumers, U.S. city average, all items, 1982-84=100.18    The provisions of this subsection (a), other than this 19sentence, are inoperative after August 31, 2026. 20    (a-1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) and 21unless otherwise indicated, the following provisions shall 22apply to the medical fee schedule starting on September 1, 232011:24        (1) The Commission shall establish and maintain fee 25    schedules for procedures, treatments, products, services, 26    or supplies for hospital inpatient, hospital outpatient,   HB2840- 4 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1    emergency room, ambulatory surgical treatment centers, 2    accredited ambulatory surgical treatment facilities, 3    prescriptions filled and dispensed outside of a licensed 4    pharmacy, dental services, and professional services. This 5    fee schedule shall be based on the fee schedule amounts 6    already established by the Commission pursuant to 7    subsection (a) of this Section. However, starting on 8    January 1, 2012, these fee schedule amounts shall be 9    grouped into geographic regions in the following manner:10            (A) Four regions for non-hospital fee schedule 11        amounts shall be utilized:12                (i) Cook County;13                (ii) DuPage, Kane, Lake, and Will Counties;14                (iii) Bond, Calhoun, Clinton, Jersey, 15            Macoupin, Madison, Monroe, Montgomery, Randolph, 16            St. Clair, and Washington Counties; and17                (iv) All other counties of the State.18            (B) Fourteen regions for hospital fee schedule 19        amounts shall be utilized:20                (i) Cook, DuPage, Will, Kane, McHenry, DeKalb, 21            Kendall, and Grundy Counties;22                (ii) Kankakee County;23                (iii) Madison, St. Clair, Macoupin, Clinton, 24            Monroe, Jersey, Bond, and Calhoun Counties;25                (iv) Winnebago and Boone Counties;26                (v) Peoria, Tazewell, Woodford, Marshall, and   HB2840- 5 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1            Stark Counties;2                (vi) Champaign, Piatt, and Ford Counties;3                (vii) Rock Island, Henry, and Mercer Counties;4                (viii) Sangamon and Menard Counties;5                (ix) McLean County;6                (x) Lake County;7                (xi) Macon County;8                (xii) Vermilion County;9                (xiii) Alexander County; and10                (xiv) All other counties of the State.11        (2) If a geozip, as defined in subsection (a) of this 12    Section, overlaps into one or more of the regions set 13    forth in this Section, then the Commission shall average 14    or repeat the charges and fees in a geozip in order to 15    designate charges and fees for each region.16        (3) In cases where the compiled data contains less 17    than 9 charges or fees for a procedure, treatment, 18    product, supply, or service or where the fee schedule 19    amount cannot be determined by the non-discounted charge 20    data, non-Medicare relative values and conversion factors 21    derived from established fee schedule amounts, coding 22    crosswalks, or other data as determined by the Commission, 23    reimbursement shall occur at 76% of charges and fees until 24    September 1, 2011 and 53.2% of charges and fees thereafter 25    as determined by the Commission in a manner consistent 26    with the provisions of this paragraph.  HB2840- 6 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1        (4) To establish additional fee schedule amounts, the 2    Commission shall utilize provider non-discounted charge 3    data, non-Medicare relative values and conversion factors 4    derived from established fee schedule amounts, and coding 5    crosswalks. The Commission may establish additional fee 6    schedule amounts based on either the charge or cost of the 7    procedure, treatment, product, supply, or service.8        (5) Implants shall be reimbursed at 25% above the net 9    manufacturer's invoice price less rebates, plus actual 10    reasonable and customary shipping charges whether or not 11    the implant charge is submitted by a provider in 12    conjunction with a bill for all other services associated 13    with the implant, submitted by a provider on a separate 14    claim form, submitted by a distributor, or submitted by 15    the manufacturer of the implant. "Implants" include the 16    following codes or any substantially similar updated code 17    as determined by the Commission: 0274 18    (prosthetics/orthotics); 0275 (pacemaker); 0276 (lens 19    implant); 0278 (implants); 0540 and 0545 (ambulance); 0624 20    (investigational devices); and 0636 (drugs requiring 21    detailed coding). Non-implantable devices or supplies 22    within these codes shall be reimbursed at 65% of actual 23    charge, which is the provider's normal rates under its 24    standard chargemaster. A standard chargemaster is the 25    provider's list of charges for procedures, treatments, 26    products, supplies, or services used to bill payers in a   HB2840- 7 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1    consistent manner.2        (6) The Commission shall automatically update all 3    codes and associated rules with the version of the codes 4    and rules valid on January 1 of that year.5    The provisions of this subsection (a-1), other than this 6sentence, are inoperative after August 31, 2026. 7    (a-1.5) The following provisions apply to procedures, 8treatments, services, products, and supplies covered under 9this Act and rendered or to be rendered on or after September 101, 2026:11        (1) In this Section:12        "CPT code" means each Current Procedural Terminology 13    code, for each geographic region specified in subsection 14    (b) of this Section, included on the most recent medical 15    fee schedule established by the Commission pursuant to 16    this Section.17        "DRG code" means each current diagnosis related group 18    code, for each geographic region specified in subsection 19    (b) of this Section, included on the most recent medical 20    fee schedule established by the Commission pursuant to 21    this Section.22        "Geozip" means a three-digit zip code based on data 23    similarities, geographical similarities, and frequencies.24        "Health care services" means those CPT and DRG codes 25    for procedures, treatments, products, services or supplies 26    for hospital inpatient, hospital outpatient, emergency   HB2840- 8 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1    room, ambulatory surgical treatment centers, accredited 2    ambulatory surgical treatment facilities, and professional 3    services. "Health care services" does not include codes 4    classified as healthcare common procedure coding systems 5    or dental.6        "Medicare maximum fee" means, for each CPT and DRG 7    code, the current maximum fee for that CPT or DRG code 8    allowed to be charged by the Centers for Medicare and 9    Medicaid Services for Medicare patients in that geographic 10    region. The Medicare maximum fee shall be the greater of 11    (i) the current maximum fee allowed to be charged by the 12    Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for Medicare 13    patients in the geographic region or (ii) the maximum fee 14    charged by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services 15    for Medicare patients in the geographic region on January 16    1, 2026.17        "Medicare percentage amount" means, for each CPT and 18    DRG code, the workers' compensation maximum fee as a 19    percentage of the Medicare maximum fee.20        "Workers' compensation maximum fee" means, for each 21    CPT and DRG code, the current maximum fee allowed to be 22    charged under the medical fee schedule established by the 23    Commission for that CPT or DRG code in that geographic 24    region.25        (2) The Commission shall establish and maintain fee 26    schedules for procedures, treatments, products, services,   HB2840- 9 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1    or supplies for hospital inpatient, hospital outpatient, 2    emergency room, ambulatory surgical treatment centers, 3    accredited ambulatory surgical treatment facilities, 4    prescriptions filled and dispensed outside of a licensed 5    pharmacy, dental services, and professional services. 6    These fee schedule amounts shall be grouped into 7    geographic regions in the following manner:8            (A) Four regions for non-hospital fee schedule 9        amounts shall be utilized:10                (i) Cook County;11                (ii) DuPage, Kane, Lake, and Will Counties;12                (iii) Bond, Calhoun, Clinton, Jersey, 13            Macoupin, Madison, Monroe, Montgomery, Randolph, 14            St. Clair, and Washington Counties; and15                (iv) all other counties of the State.16            (B) Fourteen regions for hospital fee schedule 17        amounts shall be utilized:18                (i) Cook, DuPage, Will, Kane, McHenry, DeKalb, 19            Kendall, and Grundy Counties;20                (ii) Kankakee County;21                (iii) Madison, St. Clair, Macoupin, Clinton, 22            Monroe, Jersey, Bond, and Calhoun Counties;23                (iv) Winnebago and Boone Counties;24                (v) Peoria, Tazewell, Woodford, Marshall, and 25            Stark Counties;26                (vi) Champaign, Piatt, and Ford Counties;  HB2840- 10 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1                (vii) Rock Island, Henry, and Mercer Counties;2                (viii) Sangamon and Menard Counties;3                (ix) McLean County;4                (x) Lake County;5                (xi) Macon County;6                (xii) Vermilion County;7                (xiii) Alexander County; and8                (xiv) all other counties of the State.9        If a geozip overlaps into one or more of the regions 10    set forth in this subsection, then the Commission shall 11    average or repeat the charges and fees in a geozip in order 12    to designate charges and fees for each region.13        (3) The initial workers' compensation maximum fee for 14    each CPT and DRG code as of September 1, 2026 shall be 15    determined as follows:16            (A) Within 45 days after the effective date of 17        this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the 18        Commission shall determine the Medicare percentage 19        amount for each CPT and DRG code using the most recent 20        data available.21            CPT or DRG codes which have a value, but are not 22        covered expenses under Medicare, are still compensable 23        under the medical fee schedule according to the rate 24        described in subparagraph (B).25            (B) Within 30 days after the Commission makes the 26        determinations required under subparagraph (A), the   HB2840- 11 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1        Commission shall determine an adjustment to be made to 2        the workers' compensation maximum fee for each CPT and 3        DRG code as follows:4                (i) if the Medicare percentage amount for that 5            CPT or DRG code is equal to or less than 125%, then 6            the workers' compensation maximum fee for that CPT 7            or DRG code shall be adjusted so that it equals 8            125% of the most recent Medicare maximum fee for 9            that CPT or DRG code;10                (ii) if the Medicare percentage amount for 11            that CPT or DRG code is greater than 125% but less 12            than 150%, then the workers' compensation maximum 13            fee for that CPT or DRG code shall not be adjusted;14                (iii) if the Medicare percentage amount for 15            that CPT or DRG code is greater than 150% but less 16            than or equal to 225%, then the workers' 17            compensation maximum fee for that CPT or DRG code 18            shall be adjusted so that it equals the greater of 19            (I) 150% of the most recent Medicare maximum fee 20            for that CPT or DRG code or (II) 85% of the most 21            recent workers' compensation maximum amount for 22            that CPT or DRG code;23                (iv) if the Medicare percentage amount for 24            that CPT or DRG code is greater than 225% but less 25            than or equal to 428.57%, then the workers' 26            compensation maximum fee for that CPT or DRG code   HB2840- 12 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1            shall be adjusted so that it equals the greater of 2            (I) 191.25% of the most recent Medicare maximum 3            fee for that CPT or DRG code or (II) 70% of the 4            most recent workers' compensation maximum amount 5            for that CPT or DRG code; or6                (v) if the Medicare percentage amount for that 7            CPT or DRG code is greater than 428.57%, then the 8            workers' compensation maximum fee for that CPT or 9            DRG code shall be adjusted so that it equals 300% 10            of the most recent Medicare maximum fee for that 11            CPT or DRG code.12            The Commission shall promptly publish on its 13        website the adjustments determined pursuant to this 14        subparagraph (B).15            (C) The initial workers' compensation maximum fee 16        for each CPT and DRG code as of September 1, 2026 shall 17        be equal to the workers' compensation maximum fee for 18        that code as determined and adjusted pursuant to 19        subparagraph (B), subject to any further adjustments 20        under paragraph (5) of this subsection.21        (4) The Commission, as of September 1, 2027 and 22    September 1 of each year thereafter, shall adjust the 23    workers' compensation maximum fee for each CPT or DRG code 24    to exactly half of the most recent annual increase in the 25    Consumer Price Index-U.26        (5) A person who believes that the workers'   HB2840- 13 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1    compensation maximum fee for a CPT or DRG code, as 2    otherwise determined pursuant to this subsection, creates 3    or would create upon implementation a significant 4    limitation on access to quality health care in either a 5    specific field of health care services or a specific 6    geographic limitation on access to health care may 7    petition the Commission to modify the workers' 8    compensation maximum fee for that CPT or DRG code so as to 9    not create that significant limitation.10        The petitioner bears the burden of demonstrating, by a 11    preponderance of the credible evidence, that the workers' 12    compensation maximum fee that would otherwise apply would 13    create a significant limitation on access to quality 14    health care in either a specific field of health care 15    services or a specific geographic limitation on access to 16    health care. Petitions shall be made publicly available. 17    Such credible evidence shall include empirical data 18    demonstrating a significant limitation on access to 19    quality health care. Other interested persons may file 20    comments or responses to a petition within 30 days after 21    the filing of a petition.22        The Commission shall take final action on each 23    petition within 180 days after filing. The Commission may, 24    but is not required to, seek the recommendation of the 25    Medical Fee Advisory Board to assist with this 26    determination. If the Commission grants the petition, the   HB2840- 14 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1    Commission shall further increase the workers' 2    compensation maximum fee for that CPT or DRG code by the 3    amount minimally necessary to avoid creating a significant 4    limitation on access to quality health care in either a 5    specific field of health care services or a specific 6    geographic limitation on access to health care. The 7    increased workers' compensation maximum fee shall take 8    effect upon entry of the Commission's final action. 9    (a-2) For procedures, treatments, services, or supplies 10covered under this Act and rendered or to be rendered on or 11after September 1, 2011, the maximum allowable payment shall 12be 70% of the fee schedule amounts, which shall be adjusted 13yearly by the Consumer Price Index-U, as described in 14subsection (a) of this Section. The provisions of this 15subsection (a-2), other than this sentence, are inoperative 16after August 31, 2026.17    (a-3) Prescriptions filled and dispensed outside of a 18licensed pharmacy shall be subject to a fee schedule that 19shall not exceed the Average Wholesale Price (AWP) plus a 20dispensing fee of $4.18. AWP or its equivalent as registered 21by the National Drug Code shall be set forth for that drug on 22that date as published in Medispan. 23    (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a), if 24the Commission finds that there is a significant limitation on 25access to quality health care in either a specific field of 26health care services or a specific geographic limitation on   HB2840- 15 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1access to health care, it may change the Consumer Price 2Index-U increase or decrease for that specific field or 3specific geographic limitation on access to health care to 4address that limitation.5    (c) The Commission shall establish by rule a process to 6review those medical cases or outliers that involve 7extra-ordinary treatment to determine whether to make an 8additional adjustment to the maximum payment within a fee 9schedule for a procedure, treatment, or service.10    (d) When a patient notifies a provider that the treatment, 11procedure, or service being sought is for a work-related 12illness or injury and furnishes the provider the name and 13address of the responsible employer, the provider shall bill 14the employer or its designee directly. The employer or its 15designee shall make payment for treatment in accordance with 16the provisions of this Section directly to the provider, 17except that, if a provider has designated a third-party 18billing entity to bill on its behalf, payment shall be made 19directly to the billing entity. Providers shall submit bills 20and records in accordance with the provisions of this Section. 21        (1) All payments to providers for treatment provided 22    pursuant to this Act shall be made within 30 days of 23    receipt of the bills as long as the bill contains 24    substantially all the required data elements necessary to 25    adjudicate the bill. 26        (2) If the bill does not contain substantially all the   HB2840- 16 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1    required data elements necessary to adjudicate the bill, 2    or the claim is denied for any other reason, in whole or in 3    part, the employer or insurer shall provide written 4    notification to the provider in the form of an explanation 5    of benefits explaining the basis for the denial and 6    describing any additional necessary data elements within 7    30 days of receipt of the bill. The Commission, with 8    assistance from the Medical Fee Advisory Board, shall 9    adopt rules detailing the requirements for the explanation 10    of benefits required under this subsection. 11        (3) In the case (i) of nonpayment to a provider within 12    30 days of receipt of the bill which contained 13    substantially all of the required data elements necessary 14    to adjudicate the bill, (ii) of nonpayment to a provider 15    of a portion of such a bill, or (iii) where the provider 16    has not been issued an explanation of benefits for a bill, 17    the bill, or portion of the bill up to the lesser of the 18    actual charge or the payment level set by the Commission 19    in the fee schedule established in this Section, shall 20    incur interest at a rate of 1% per month payable by the 21    employer to the provider. Any required interest payments 22    shall be made by the employer or its insurer to the 23    provider within 30 days after payment of the bill. 24        (4) If the employer or its insurer fails to pay 25    interest within 30 days after payment of the bill as 26    required pursuant to paragraph (3), the provider may bring   HB2840- 17 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1    an action in circuit court for the sole purpose of seeking 2    payment of interest pursuant to paragraph (3) against the 3    employer or its insurer responsible for insuring the 4    employer's liability pursuant to item (3) of subsection 5    (a) of Section 4. The circuit court's jurisdiction shall 6    be limited to enforcing payment of interest pursuant to 7    paragraph (3). Interest under paragraph (3) is only 8    payable to the provider. An employee is not responsible 9    for the payment of interest under this Section. The right 10    to interest under paragraph (3) shall not delay, diminish, 11    restrict, or alter in any way the benefits to which the 12    employee or his or her dependents are entitled under this 13    Act. 14    The changes made to this subsection (d) by this amendatory 15Act of the 100th General Assembly apply to procedures, 16treatments, and services rendered on and after the effective 17date of this amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly. 18    (e) Except as provided in subsections (e-5), (e-10), and 19(e-15), a provider shall not hold an employee liable for costs 20related to a non-disputed procedure, treatment, or service 21rendered in connection with a compensable injury. The 22provisions of subsections (e-5), (e-10), (e-15), and (e-20) 23shall not apply if an employee provides information to the 24provider regarding participation in a group health plan. If 25the employee participates in a group health plan, the provider 26may submit a claim for services to the group health plan. If   HB2840- 18 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1the claim for service is covered by the group health plan, the 2employee's responsibility shall be limited to applicable 3deductibles, co-payments, or co-insurance. Except as provided 4under subsections (e-5), (e-10), (e-15), and (e-20), a 5provider shall not bill or otherwise attempt to recover from 6the employee the difference between the provider's charge and 7the amount paid by the employer or the insurer on a compensable 8injury, or for medical services or treatment determined by the 9Commission to be excessive or unnecessary.10    (e-5) If an employer notifies a provider that the employer 11does not consider the illness or injury to be compensable 12under this Act, the provider may seek payment of the 13provider's actual charges from the employee for any procedure, 14treatment, or service rendered. Once an employee informs the 15provider that there is an application filed with the 16Commission to resolve a dispute over payment of such charges, 17the provider shall cease any and all efforts to collect 18payment for the services that are the subject of the dispute. 19Any statute of limitations or statute of repose applicable to 20the provider's efforts to collect payment from the employee 21shall be tolled from the date that the employee files the 22application with the Commission until the date that the 23provider is permitted to resume collection efforts under the 24provisions of this Section.25    (e-10) If an employer notifies a provider that the 26employer will pay only a portion of a bill for any procedure,   HB2840- 19 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1treatment, or service rendered in connection with a 2compensable illness or disease, the provider may seek payment 3from the employee for the remainder of the amount of the bill 4up to the lesser of the actual charge, negotiated rate, if 5applicable, or the payment level set by the Commission in the 6fee schedule established in this Section. Once an employee 7informs the provider that there is an application filed with 8the Commission to resolve a dispute over payment of such 9charges, the provider shall cease any and all efforts to 10collect payment for the services that are the subject of the 11dispute. Any statute of limitations or statute of repose 12applicable to the provider's efforts to collect payment from 13the employee shall be tolled from the date that the employee 14files the application with the Commission until the date that 15the provider is permitted to resume collection efforts under 16the provisions of this Section.17    (e-15) When there is a dispute over the compensability of 18or amount of payment for a procedure, treatment, or service, 19and a case is pending or proceeding before an Arbitrator or the 20Commission, the provider may mail the employee reminders that 21the employee will be responsible for payment of any procedure, 22treatment or service rendered by the provider. The reminders 23must state that they are not bills, to the extent practicable 24include itemized information, and state that the employee need 25not pay until such time as the provider is permitted to resume 26collection efforts under this Section. The reminders shall not   HB2840- 20 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1be provided to any credit rating agency. The reminders may 2request that the employee furnish the provider with 3information about the proceeding under this Act, such as the 4file number, names of parties, and status of the case. If an 5employee fails to respond to such request for information or 6fails to furnish the information requested within 90 days of 7the date of the reminder, the provider is entitled to resume 8any and all efforts to collect payment from the employee for 9the services rendered to the employee and the employee shall 10be responsible for payment of any outstanding bills for a 11procedure, treatment, or service rendered by a provider.12    (e-20) Upon a final award or judgment by an Arbitrator or 13the Commission, or a settlement agreed to by the employer and 14the employee, a provider may resume any and all efforts to 15collect payment from the employee for the services rendered to 16the employee and the employee shall be responsible for payment 17of any outstanding bills for a procedure, treatment, or 18service rendered by a provider as well as the interest awarded 19under subsection (d) of this Section. In the case of a 20procedure, treatment, or service deemed compensable, the 21provider shall not require a payment rate, excluding the 22interest provisions under subsection (d), greater than the 23lesser of the actual charge or the payment level set by the 24Commission in the fee schedule established in this Section. 25Payment for services deemed not covered or not compensable 26under this Act is the responsibility of the employee unless a   HB2840- 21 -LRB104 11298 SPS 21384 b1provider and employee have agreed otherwise in writing. 2Services not covered or not compensable under this Act are not 3subject to the fee schedule in this Section.4    (f) Nothing in this Act shall prohibit an employer or 5insurer from contracting with a health care provider or group 6of health care providers for reimbursement levels for benefits 7under this Act different from those provided in this Section.8    (g) On or before January 1, 2010 the Commission shall 9provide to the Governor and General Assembly a report 10regarding the implementation of the medical fee schedule and 11the index used for annual adjustment to that schedule as 12described in this Section.13(Source: P.A. 100-1117, eff. 11-27-18; 100-1175, eff. 141-11-19.) 15    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 16becoming law.